vi: Loại đế: Nhôm; Alumite; Anodilium; Tự động làm sạch; Careeza; Gốm; Gốm cải tiến; Gốm cao cấp; Ceranium; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; Kết hợp hơi nước; Kim cương 4D; Kim cương lướt; Thermolon kép; Durilium; Durilium Airglide; Tự động làm sạch Durilium Airglide auto clean; Tự động làm sạch Durilium Airglide auto clean ultra thin; Tự động làm sạch Durilium auto clean; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Glide x soleplate; Glissium; Vàng; Honeycomb; Microsteam; Thép nano; Gốm nano bạc; Chống dính; PTFE; Palladium; Pearlonic 380; Pro ceramic; Bảo vệ; RESILIUM; Saphir; Thép không gỉ; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-ionic glide; Titanium; Gốm tourmaline; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Khác
ko: 열판 유형: 알루미늄; 알루마이트; 아노딜륨; 자동 청소; 카레자; 세라믹; 세라믹 글라이드; 세라믹 울트라 글라이드; 세라늄; 세라늄 글리스; 세릴륨; 크로스 스팀; 다이아몬드 4D; 다이아몬드 글라이드; 듀얼 써모론; 두릴륨; 두릴륨 에어글라이드; 두릴륨 에어글라이드 자동 청소; 두릴륨 에어글라이드 자동 청소 울트라 씬; 두릴륨 자동 청소; 다이나글라이드; 엘록살; 엘록살 플러스; 글라이드 x 열판; 글리시움; 금색; 벌집; 마이크로스팀; 나노강; 나노은 세라믹; 붙지 않음; PTFE; 팔라듐; Pearlonic 380; 프로 세라믹; 프로텍트; RESILIUM; Saphir; 스테인리스 스틸; 스팀 다리미; SteamGlide elite; T-ionic glide; 티타늄; 전기석 세라믹; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta likalne plošče: Aluminij; Alumit; Anodilium; Samodejno čiščenje; Careeza; Keramika; Ceramic glide; Ceramic ultra glide; Ceranium; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; Cross steam; Diamond 4D; Diamond glide; Dvojni termolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide samodejno čiščenje; Durilium airglide ultra tanek samodejno čiščenje; Durilium samodejno čiščenje; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Glide x likalna plošča; Glisium; Zlat; Satje; Mikropara; Nano jeklo; Nano-srebrna keramika; Se ne prijema; PTFE; Paladij; Pearlonic 380; Pro ceramic; Zaščitna; RESILIUM; Saphir; Nerjavno jeklo; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-ionic glide; Titan; Turmalinska keramika; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Drugo
cs: Typ žehlicího povrchu: Hliník; Hlinitan; Anodilium; Automatické čištění; Careeza; Keramika; Ceramic glide; Ceramic ultra glide; Ceranium; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; Křížová pára; Diamant 4D; Diamond glide; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide s automatickým čištěním; Durilium airglide s automatickým čištěním ultratenké; Durilium automatické čištění; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Glide x žehlicí plocha; Glissium; Zlatá; Honeycomb; Mikropára; Nano ocel; Nanosříbrná keramika; Nepřilnavé; PTFE; Paladium; Pearlonic 380; Pro ceramic; Ochrana; RESILIUM; Saphir; Nerezová ocel; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-ionic glide; Titanové; Turmalínová keramika; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Jiné
sv: Typ av stryksula: Aluminium; Alumit; Anodilium; Rengör automatiskt; Careeza; Keramisk; Ceramic glide; Ceramic ultra glide; Keranium; Ceranium glissée; Cerilium; Korsånga; Diamant; Diamantglid; Dubbel thermolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide automatisk rengöring; Durilium airglide automatisk rengöring ultratunn; Durilium automatisk rengöring; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Glide x stryksula; Glissium; Gyllene; Honeycomb; Microsteam; Nanostål; Nano-silver keramik; Non-stick; PTFE; Palladium; Pearlonic 380; Pro-keramik; Skydda; RESILIUM; Saphir; Rostfritt stål; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-jonisk glid; Titan; Turmalinkeramik; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glid; Annat
es: Tipo de suela: Aluminio; Alumita; Anodilio; Limpieza automática; Careeza; Cerámica; Deslizamiento cerámico; Deslizamiento cerámico ultra; Ceranio; Glisse de ceranio; Cerilio; Punto de cruz; Diamante 4D; Deslizamiento de diamante; Termolón doble; Durilio; Deslizamiento de aire Durilium; Deslizamiento de aire Durilium con autolimpieza; Deslizamiento de aire Durilium con autolimpieza ultra delgado; Durilium con autolimpieza; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Deslizamiento x suela; Glisio; Dorado; Panal; Microsteam; Nanoacero; Cerámica de nanoplata; Antiadherente; PTFE; Paladio; Pearlonic 380; Pro ceramic; Protect; RESILIUM; Saphir; Acero inoxidable; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; Deslizamiento T-iónico; Titanio; Cerámica turmalina; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Otros
pt-PT: Tipo de placa de metal: Alumínio; Alumina; Anodílio; Limpeza automática; Careeza; Cerâmica; Ceramic Glide; Ceramic Ultra Glide; Ceranium; Ceranium Glissée; Cerilium; Vapor cruzado; Diamond 4D; Diamond Glide; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium AirGlide; Durilium AirGlide Autoclean; Durilium Airglide Autoclean Ultra Thin; Durilium Autoclean; DynaGlide; Eloxal; Eloxal Plus; Glide x soleplate; Glissium; Ouro; Honeycomb; Microsteam; Nano steel; Nano-silver Cceramic; Antiaderente; PTFE; Palladium; Pearlonic 380; Pro Ceramic; Protect; RESILIUM; Saphir; Aço inoxidável; SteamGlide; SteamGlide Elite; T-ionicGlide; Titânio; Cerâmica turmalina; Ultragliss; Ultragliss Durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress Glide; Outro
pl: Typ stopy żelazka: Aluminium; Ałunit; Anodilium; Auto clean; Careeza; Ceramika; Ceramic glide; Ceramic ultra glide; Ceranium; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; Cross steam; Diamond 4D; Diamond glide; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide auto clean; Durilium airglide auto clean ultra thin; Durilium auto clean; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Glide x soleplate; Glissium; Złota; Plaster; Mikropara; Nano steel; Nano-silver ceramic; Nieprzywierająca; PTFE; Pallad; Pearlonic 380; Pro ceramic; Protect; RESILIUM; Szafir; Stal nierdzewna; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-ionic glide; Titanium; Tourmaline ceramic; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Pozostałe
bg-BG: Тип гладеща плоча: Алуминий; Алумит; Анодилиум; Автоматично почистване; Кариза; Керамика; Ceramic glide; Ceramic ultra glide; Ceranium; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; Cross steam; Diamond 4D; Diamond glide; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide с автоматично почистване; Durilium airglide с автоматично почистване ултратънка; Durilium с автоматично почистване; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Glide x soleplate; Glissium; Злато; Пчелна пита; Microsteam; Нано стомана; Нано-сребърна керамика; Незалепващо покритие; PTFE; Паладий; Pearlonic 380; Pro ceramic; Protect; RESILIUM; Saphir; Неръждаема стомана; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-ionic glide; Титан; Турмалинова керамика; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Други
nl: Zoolplaattype: Aluminium; Alumiet; Anodilium; Automatisch reinigen; Careeza; Keramiek; Keramisch glas; Ceramic ultra glide; Ceranium; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; Cross steam; Diamond 4D; Diamond glide; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide auto clean; Durilium airglide auto clean ultra thin; Durilium automatische reiniging; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Glide x zoolplaat; Glissium; Gold; Honingraat; Microsteam; Nanostaal; Nanozilver keramiek; Anti-kleef; PTFE; Palladium; Pearlonic 380; Pro ceramic; Protect; RESILIUM; Saphir; Roestvrij staal; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-ionic glide; Titanium; Toermalijn keramiek; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Andere
hu: Talplemez típusa: Alumínium; Aluminit; Anodilium; Automatikus tisztítás; Careeza; Kerámia; Kerámiacsúszás; Kerámia-ultracsúszás; Ceranium; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; Keresztgőz; Gyémánt 4D; Gyémántcsúszás; Kettős thermolon; Durilium; Durilium légcsúszó; Durilium légcsúszó automatikus tisztítás; Durilium légcsúszó automatikus tisztítás ultravékony; Durilium automatikus tisztítás; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plusz; Glide x vasalótalp; Glissium; Arany; Méhsejt alakú; Microsteam; Nano acél; Nano-ezüst kerámia; Tapadásmentes; PTFE; Palladium; Pearlonic 380; Pro kerámia; Védelem; RESILIUM; Zafír; Rozsdamentes acél; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elit; T-ionos csúszás; Titán; Turmalin kerámia; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Egyéb
tr: Taban Tipi: Alüminyum; Alümit; Anodilyum; Otomatik temizleme; Careeza; Seramik; Seramik kayma; Seramik ultra kayganlık; Seranyum; Seranyum parıltısı; Serilyum; Çapraz buhar; Elmas 4D; Elmas kayma; Çift Termolon; Durilyum; Durilium hava kanadı; Durilium hava kanadı otomatik temizleme; Durilium hava kanadı otomatik temizleme ultra ince; Durilium otomatik temizleme; Dynaglide; Eloksal; Eloksal artı; Glide x levha; Glisyum; Gold; Bal peteği; Microsteam; Nano çelik; Nano gümüş seramik; Yapışmaz; PTFE; Paladyum; Pearlonik 380; Profesyonel seramik; Koruma; RESILIUM; Safir; Paslanmaz çelik; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elit; T-iyonik kayma; Titanyum; Turmalin seramik; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilyum; XL dayanıklı kayma; Xpress kayma; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip talpă: Aluminiu; Alumit; Anodilium; Curățare automată; Careeza; Ceramic; Ceramic glide; Ceramic ultra glide; Ceranium; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; Abur încrucișat; Diamond 4D; Diamond glide; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide curățare automată; Durilium airglide curățare automată ultra subțire; Durilium curățare automată; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Glide x soleplate; Glissium; Auriu; Fagure; Micro-abur; Nano oțel; Ceramică cu nano-argint; Anti-aderentă; PTFE; Paladiu; Pearlonic 380; Pro ceramică; Protecție; RESILIUM; Safir; Oțel inoxidabil; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-ionic glide; Titan; Turmalină ceramică; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Altele
zh-TW: 底板類型: 鋁; 耐酸鋁; Anodilium; 自動清潔; Careeza; 陶瓷; 陶瓷滑移; 陶瓷超滑移; 銫; 鈹; 銫; 十字蒸氣; 鑽石 4D; 鑽石滑移; 陶瓷不粘塗層; Durilium; Durilium 空氣滑移; Durilium 空氣滑移自動清潔; Durilium 空氣滑移自動清潔超薄; Durilium 自動清潔; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal Plus; 滑行 x 底板; Glissium; 金色; 蜂巢; Microsteam; 奈米鋼; 奈米銀陶瓷; 不沾黏; PTFE; 鈀; Pearlonic 380; 專業陶瓷; 保護; RESILIUM; 藍寶石; 不銹鋼; SteamGlide; SteamGlide 菁英; T-ionic 滑移; 鈦; 電氣石陶瓷; 超玻璃; Ultragliss Durilium; XL Duraglide; Xpress 滑移; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de base do ferro: Alumínio; Alumite; Anodilium; Auto clean; Careeza; Cerâmica; Ceramic glide; Ceramic ultra glide; Ceranium; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; Vapor cruzado; Diamond 4D; Diamond glide; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide auto clean; Durilium airglide auto clean ultra thin; Durilium auto clean; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Glide x soleplate; Glissium; Gold; Favo de mel; Microvapor; Nanoaço; Nano-silver ceramic; Antiaderente; PTFE; Palladium; Pearlonic 380; Pro ceramic; Proteção; RESILIUM; Saphir; Aço inoxidável; Ferro a vapor; SteamGlide elite; T-ionic glide; Titânio; Cerâmica turmalina; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Outro
el: Τύπος πλάκας: Αλουμίνιο; Αλουμίτης; Ανοδίλιο; Αυτόματος καθαρισμός; Careeza; Κεραμικό; Κεραμική ολίσθηση; Κεραμικό ultra glide; Κεράνιο; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; Σταυρός ατμός; Διαμάντι; Διαμαντένια γλιστρίδα; Διπλό Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Αυτόματος καθαρισμός Durilium airglide; Αυτόματο καθαρισμό Durilium airglide εξαιρετικά λεπτό; Αυτόματος καθαρισμός Durilium; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Γλιστρήστε x πλάκα; Γλυσσίου; Χρυσό; Honeycomb; Microsteam; Νανοατσάλι; Nano-silver κεραμικό; Αντικολλητικό; PTFE; Παλλάδιο; Pearlonic 380; Pro κεραμικό; Προστατεύω; RESILIUM; Σαφίρ; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-ιονική ολίσθηση; Τιτάνιο; Κεραμική τουρμαλίνη; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Άλλο
de: Bügelsohlentyp: Aluminium; Alumit; Anodilium; Automatische Reinigung; Careeza; Keramik; Keramikgleiter; Keramik-Ultra-Glide; Ceranium; Ceranium-Glisse; Cerilium; Querdampf; Diamond 4D; Diamond Glide; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium AirGlide; Durilium AirGlide Auto Clean; Durilium AirGlide Auto Clean ultradünn; Durilium Auto Clean; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Glide x-Bügelsohle; Glissium; Gold; Honeycomb; Microsteam; Nanostahl; Nanosilber-Keramik; Anti-Haftend; PTFE; Palladium; Pearlonic 380; Pro Ceramic; Protect; RESILIUM; Saphir; Edelstahl; SteamGlide; SteamGlide Elite; T-ionic Glide; Titan; Turmalin-Keramik; Ultragliss; Ultragliss Durilium; XL-Duraglide; Xpress Glide; Sonstiges
nb: Såleplatetype: Aluminium; Alumitt; Anodilium; Selvrens; Careeza; Keramikk; Keramisk glid; Keramisk ultraglid; Keranium; Keranglisse; Cerilium; Kryssdamp; Diamant 4D; Diamantglid; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide auto clean; Durilium airglide auto clean ultra thin; Durilium selvrens; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal pluss; Glide x såleplate; Glissium; Gull; Bikake; Mikrodamp; Nanostål; Nano-sølv keramikk; Ikke-klebende; PTFE; Palladium; Pearlonic 380; Pro-keramikk; Beskytte; RESILIUM; Saphir; Rustfritt stål; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-ionisk glid; Titan; Turmalinkeramikk; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Annen
sk-SK: Typ žehliacej plochy: Hliník; Alumit; Anodilium; Automatické čistenie; Careeza; Keramika; Keramický klzný povrch; Keramický ultra klzný povrch; Ceranium; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; Krížová para; Diamant 4D; Diamantový klzný povrch; Dvojitý termolon; Durilium; Duriliový airglide; Automatické čistenie Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide auto clean ultra tenký; Automatické čistenie Durilium; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Glide x žehliaca plocha; Glissium; Zlato; Honeycomb; Microsteam; Nano oceľ; Nano-strieborná keramika; Nepriľnavý; PTFE; Paládium; Pearlonic 380; Profesionálna keramika; Chrániť; RESÍLIUM; Zafír; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-iónový klzný povrch; Titán; Turmalínová keramika; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Kĺzanie Xpress; Iné
en: Soleplate type: Aluminum; Alumite; Anodilium; Auto clean; Careeza; Ceramic; Ceramic glide; Ceramic ultra glide; Ceranium; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; Cross steam; Diamond 4D; Diamond glide; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide auto clean; Durilium airglide auto clean ultra thin; Durilium auto clean; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Glide x soleplate; Glissium; Gold; Honeycomb; Microsteam; Nano steel; Nano-silver ceramic; Non-stick; PTFE; Palladium; Pearlonic 380; Pro ceramic; Protect; RESILIUM; Saphir; Stainless steel; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-ionic glide; Titanium; Tourmaline ceramic; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta ploče: Aluminij; Alumit; Anodilium; Automatsko čišćenje; Careeza; Keramika; Ceramic Glide; Keramička ploča s iznimnim klizanjem; Ceranium; Ceranium Glisse; Cerilium; Unakrsna para; Diamond 4D; Diamond Glide; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium Airglide; Ploča Durilium Airglide s automatskim čišćenjem; Iznimno tanka ploča Durilium Airglide s automatskim čišćenjem; Ploča Durilium s automatskim čišćenjem; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal Plus; Ploča Glide X; Glissium; Zlatna; Saće; Mikropara; Nano čelik; Nano-srebrna keramička ploča; Neprianjajuća; PTFE; Palladium; Pearlonic 380; Pro Ceramic; Zaštita; RESILIUM; Saphir; Nehrđajući čelik; SteamGlide; SteamGlide Elite; T-ionic Glide; Titanij; Turmalinska keramika; Ultragliss; Ultragliss Durilium; XL Duraglide; Xpress Glide; Ostalo
zh-CN: 底板类型: 铝; 耐酸铝; 阳极氧化铝; 自动清洁; Careeza; 陶瓷制品; 陶瓷滑移; 超滑陶瓷; Ceranium; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; 蒸汽传输; 四维钻石; 钻石滑移; 双层特姆龙; 杜拉系铝; 杜拉系铝空气滑移; 杜拉系铝空气滑移自动清洁; 超薄杜拉系铝空气滑移自动清洁; 杜拉系铝自动清洁; Dynaglide; 阳极氧化铝; 阳极氧化铝+; 滑移 x 底板; Glissium; 金色; 蜂窝; Microsteam; 纳米钢; 纳米银陶瓷; 不粘; PTFE; 钯; 珍珠陶瓷 380; 专业陶瓷; 保护; 弹性; 蓝宝石; 不锈钢; SteamGlide; SteamGlide 优质; T-离子滑移; 钛; 电气石陶瓷; 超滑; 超滑杜拉系铝; 超大滑移; 快速滑移; 其他
th: ประเภทแผ่นความร้อน: อะลูมิเนียม; อลูไมต์; อโนดิเลียม; ทำความสะอาดอัตโนมัติ; Careeza; เซรามิก; Ceramic Glide; Ceramic Ultra Glide; Ceranium; Ceranium Glisse; Cerilium; เตารีดแบบครอสสตีม; Diamond 4D; Diamond Glide; เทอร์โมลอนแบบคู่; Durilium; Durilium Airglide; Durilium Airglide Autoclean; Durilium Airglide Autoclean Ultra Thin; Durilium Autoclean; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal Plus; แผ่นความร้อน Glide X; Glissium; โกลด์; รังผึ้ง; Microsteam; เหล็กนาโน; เซรามิกนาโนซิลเวอร์; ไม่เกาะติด; PTFE; แพลเลเดียม; Pearlonic 380; โปรเซรามิก; Protect; Resilium; Saphir; เหล็กสเตนเลส; SteamGlide; SteamGlide Elite; T-ionicGlide; ไทเทเนียม; เซรามิกทัวร์มาลีน; Ultragliss; Ultragliss Durilium; XL Duraglide; Xpress Glide; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип подошвы: Алюминий; Алюмит; Анодилий; Автоматическая очистка; Careeza; Керамика; Гладкое керамическое покрытие; Ультрагладкое керамическое покрытие; Ceranium; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; Cross steam; Diamond 4D; Diamond glide; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide auto clean; Durilium airglide auto clean ultra thin; Durilium auto clean; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Подошва Glide x; Glissium; Золото; Соты; Микропар; Нано сталь; Нано-серебряная керамика; Антипригарное покрытие; ПТФЭ; Палладий; Pearlonic 380; Профессиональная керамика; Защита; RESILIUM; Saphir; Нержавеющая сталь; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-ionic glide; Титан; Турмалиновая керамика; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Другое
da: Såltype: Aluminum; Alumite; Anodilium; Auto clean; Careeza; Keramik; Keramisk glide; Keramisk ultra glide; Keranium; Keranium glisse; Cerilium; Cross steam; Diamond 4D; Diamond glide; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide auto clean; Durilium airglide auto clean ultra thin; Durilium auto clean; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Glide x soleplate; Glissium; Guld; Honeycomb; Microsteam; Nano-stål; Nano-sølv keramik; Non-stick; PTFE; Palladium; Pearlonic 380; Pro-keramik; Protect; RESILIUM; Saphir; Rustfrit stål; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-ionic glide; Titanium; Turmalin-keramik; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Andet
it: Tipo piastra: Alluminio; Alumite; Anodilium; Autopulente; Careeza; Ceramica; Ceramic glide; Ceramic ultra glide; Ceranium; Ceranium glisse; Cerilium; Vapore incrociato; Diamond 4D; Diamond glide; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide autopulente; Durilium airglide autopulente ultrasottile; Durilium autopulente; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Piastra Glide x; Glissium; Oro; Honeycomb; Microsteam; Nano steel; Ceramica nano-silver; Non antiaderente; PTFE; Palladio; Pearlonic 380; Pro ceramic; Protect; RESILIUM; Saphir; Acciaio inossidabile; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-ionic glide; Titanio; Tourmaline ceramic; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Altro
ja: ソールプレートタイプ: アルミニウム; アルマイト; アノジリウム; オートクリーン; カリーザ; セラミック; セラミックグライド; セラミックウルトラグライド; セラニウム; セラニウムグリッセ; セリリウム; クロススチーム; ダイヤモンド4D; ダイヤモンドグライド; デュアルサーモロン; デュリリウム; デュリリウムエアグライド; デュリリウムエアグライド　オートクリーン; デュリリウムエアグライド　オートクリーン　超薄型; デュリリウムオートクリーン; ダイナグライド; エロクサール; エロクサールプラス; グライドxソールプレート; グリシウム; ゴールド; ハニカム; マイクロスチーム; ナノスチール; ナノシルバーセラミック; ノンスティック; PTFE; パラジウム; パーロニック380; プロセラミック; プロテクト; RESILIUM; サフィール; ステンレススチール; SteamGlide; SteamGlideエリート; T-イオングライド; チタン; トルマリンセラミック; ウルトラグリス; ウルトラグリス デュリリウム; XLデュラグライド; Xpressグライド; その他
fr: Type de semelle: Aluminum; Alumite; Anodilium; Nettoyage automatique; Careeza; Céramique; Ceramic Glide; céramique Ultraglide; Céranium; Céranium glisse; Cérilium; Cross Steam; Diamant 4D; Diamond glide; Dual Thermolon; Durilium; Durilium airglide; Durilium airglide autoclean; Durilium airglide autoclean ultra thin; Nettoyage automatique Durilium; Dynaglide; Éloxal; Eloxal plus; Semelle Glide x; Glissium; Or; Honeycomb; Microsteam; Acier nano; Céramique nano-argent; Anti-adhérent; PTFE; Palladium; Pearlonic 380; Pro ceramic; Protège; RÉSILIUM; Saphir; Acier inoxydable; SteamGlide; SteamGlide élite; T-ionic glide; Titane; Céramique tourmaline; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; Duraglide XL; Xpress glide; Autre
fi: Aluslaattatyyppi: Alumiini; Alumiitti; Anodilium; Automaattinen puhdistus; Careeza; Keraaminen; Keraaminen liukas; Keraaminen ultra-glide; Keraani; Keraani-glisse; Ceriliumi; Ristihöyry; Timantti-4D; Timanttiliuku; Kaksois-Thermolon; Duriliumi; Durilium-airglide; Durilium-airglide -automaattipuhdistus; Durilium-airglide -automaattipuhdistus, erittäin ohut; Durilium -automaattipuhdistus; Dynaglide; Eloxal; Eloxal plus; Glide x -pohja; Glissium; Kulta; Hunajakenno; Microsteam; Nanoteräs; Nanohopea, keraaminen; Tarttumaton; PTFE; Palladiumi; Pearlonic 380; Pro-keraaminen; Suojella; RESILIUM; Saphir; Ruostumaton teräs; SteamGlide; SteamGlide elite; T-ionic glide; Titaani; Turmaliini, keraaminen; Ultragliss; Ultragliss durilium; XL duraglide; Xpress glide; Muu
lt-LT: Pado tipas: Aliuminis; Aliumitas; „Anodilium“; „Auto Clean“; „Careeza“; Keramika; „Ceramic Glide“; „Ceramic Ultra Glide“; „Ceranium“; „Ceranium Glisse“; „Cerilium“; „Cross Steam“; „Diamond 4D“; „Diamond Glide“; „Dual Thermolon“; „Durilium“; „Durilium Airglide“; „Durilium Airglide Auto Clean“; „Durilium Airglide Auto Clean Ultra Thin“; „Durilium Auto Clean“; „Dynaglide“; „Eloxal“; „Eloxal Plus“; „Glide x“ padas; „Glissium“; Auksinė; „Honeycomb“; „Microsteam“; Plieno nanodanga; Sidabro nanodalelių keramika; Nelipnus; PTFE; Paladis; „Pearlonic 380“; „Pro Ceramic“; „Protect“; RESILIUM; „Saphir“; Nerūdijantysis plienas; „SteamGlide“; „SteamGlide Elite“; „T-ionic Glide“; Titanas; Turmalino keramika; „Ultragliss“; „Ultragliss Durilium“; „XL Duraglide“; „Xpress Glide“; Kita